Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-402
Hunting, fishing, or fur-harvesting permit; persons exempt.

The following persons are exempt from the requirements of section 37-401:

(1) The owner or his or her invitee who takes fish in any body of water (a) which is entirely upon privately owned land, (b) which is entirely privately stocked, (c) which does not connect by inflow or outflow with other water outside such land, and (d) which is not operated on a commercial basis for profit; and

(2) Any paraplegic who takes fish in his or her privately owned body of water if he or she does not operate such body of water on a commercial basis for profit.

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 112.